Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1710
Commodity option, defined.

Commodity option shall mean any account, agreement, or contract giving a party thereto the right but not the obligation to purchase or sell one or more commodities or one or more commodity contracts, whether characterized as an option, privilege, indemnity, bid, offer, put, call, advance guaranty, decline guaranty, or otherwise, but shall not include an option traded on a national securities exchange registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 10.